Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2415XC (2) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 483A.24, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 16A. Upon payment of a fee established 3 by rules adopted pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime 4 fur harvester license, the department shall issue a lifetime 5 fur harvester license to a resident of Iowa who has served in 6 the armed forces of the United States on federal active duty 7 and who was disabled during that veteranâs military service. 8 The department shall prepare an application to be used by a 9 person requesting a lifetime fur harvester license under this 10 subsection. The department of veterans affairs shall assist 11 the department in verifying the status or claims of applicants 12 under this subsection. As used in this subsection, âdisabledâ 13 means entitled to a service connected rating under 38 U.S.C. 14 ch. 11. 15